Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201068-969
Amendment to medicaid state plan or
waiver; children eligible for medicaid and CHIP; treatment for pregnant women;
department; duties.

(1) On or before July 1, 2010, the department shall submit
an application to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United
States Department of Health and Human Services, amending the medicaid state
plan or seeking a waiver thereto to provide for utilization of money to allow
for payments for treatment for children who are lawfully residing in the United
States and who are otherwise eligible for medicaid and CHIP pursuant to the
federal Children's Health Insurance Program Reauthorization Act of 2009, Public
Law 111-3, as such act existed on January 1, 2010, and for treatment for pregnant
women who are lawfully residing in the United States and who are otherwise
eligible for medicaid pursuant to the federal Children's Health Insurance
Program Reauthorization Act of 2009, Public Law 111-3, as such act existed
on January 1, 2010.

(2) For purposes of
this section, (a) CHIP means the Children's Health Insurance Program established
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq., and (b) medicaid means the program for
medical assistance established under 42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq., as such sections
existed on January 1, 2010.

Laws 2010, LB1106, § 5.